Utah statutes.
19-4-112.   Limit on authority of department and board to control irrigation facilities -- Precautions relating to nonpotable water systems.

(1)  Except as provided in this section and in Section 19-5-104, nothing contained in this chapter authorizes the department or board to:

(a)  exercise administrative control over water used solely for irrigation purposes, whether conveyed in pipes, ditches, canals, or by other facilities; or

(b)  adopt rules relating to the construction, operation, and maintenance of facilities for conveying  irrigation water to the place of use.

(2)  Where nonpotable water is conveyed in pipelines under pressure in areas served by a potable water system, the following precautions shall be observed:

(a)  a distinctive coloring or other marking on all exposed portions of the nonpotable system shall be used;

(b)  potable and nonpotable water system service lines and extensions shall be completely separated and shall be installed in separate trenches;

(c)  all hydrants and sprinkling system control valves shall be operated by a removable key so that it is not possible to turn on the hydrant or valve without a key;

(d)  there shall be no cross connection between the potable and nonpotable water systems;

(e)  the nonpotable system shall not be extended into any building except greenhouses or other buildings for plant and animal production; and

(f)  no connection in the nonpotable water system shall be made except by the persons responsible for its management.

